Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3818
Clerk of court; records.

The clerk of court shall keep a record for each trust involved in any document which may be filed with the court under sections 30-3816 to 30-3820, including petitions and applications, trust registrations, and of any orders or responses relating thereto by the court, and establish and maintain a system for indexing, filing, or recording which is sufficient to enable users of the records to obtain adequate information. Upon payment of the fees required by law, the clerk must issue certified copies of any record or paper filed or recorded.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 18.